Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.020

Standards of safety.

(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, shall have authority to enter upon all premises and into all buildings except private dwellings for the purpose of inspection to ascertain if any fire hazard exists, and to require conformance with minimum standards for the prevention of fire and for the protection of life and property against fire and panic as to use of premises, and may adopt by reference nationally recognized standards applicable to local conditions.

(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, may, upon request by the chief fire official or the local governing body or of taxpayers of such area, assist in the enforcement of any such code.

[ 1995 c 369 s 26; 1986 c 266 s 68; 1985 c 470 s 18; 1947 c 79 s .33.04; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 45.33.04. Formerly RCW 48.48.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.